California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(f) (1) A commission established pursuant to Section 14087.31 shall submit to a review of financial records when the department determines, based on data reported by the commission or otherwise, that the commission will not be able to meet its financial obligations to health care providers contracting with the commission. Where the review of financial records determines that the commission will not be able to meet its financial obligations to contracting health care providers for the provision of health care services, the Director of Health Services shall immediately terminate the contract between the commission and the state, and immediately transfer the commission’s Medi-Cal beneficiaries in accordance with subdivision (e) in order to ensure uninterrupted provision of health care services to the beneficiaries and to minimize financial disruption to
 providers.

(2) The action of the Director of Health Services pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be the final administrative determination. Beneficiary eligibility for Medi-Cal shall not be affected by this action.

(3) Beneficiaries who have been or who are scheduled to be transferred under subdivision (e) may make a choice to be enrolled in another managed care plan, if one is available, in full compliance with federal freedom-of-choice requirements.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department shall implement Medi-Cal capitated enrollments in a manner that ensures that appropriate levels of health care services will be provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries and that appropriate levels of administrative services will be furnished to health care providers. The contract between the department and the commission
 shall authorize and permit the department to administer the number of covered Medi-Cal enrollments in such a manner that the commission’s provider network and administrative structure are able to provide appropriate and timely services to beneficiaries and to participating providers.

(h) In the event a commission is terminated, files for bankruptcy, or otherwise no longer functions for the purpose for which it was established, the county shall, with respect to compensation for provision of health care services to beneficiaries, occupy no greater or lesser status than any other health care provider in the disbursement of assets of the commission.

(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impair or diminish the authority of the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care under Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, nor
 shall anything in the section be construed to reduce or otherwise limit the obligation of a commission licensed as a health care service plan to comply with the requirements of Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code and the rules of the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care adopted thereunder.

(j) Except as expressly provided by other provisions of this section, all exemptions and exclusions from disclosure as public records pursuant to the Public Records Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 6250) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code), including, but not limited to, those pertaining to trade secrets and information withheld in the public interest, shall be fully applicable for all state agencies and local agencies with respect to all writings that the commission is required to prepare, produce, or submit pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 197.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14087.325.

(a) The department shall require, as a condition of obtaining a contract with the department, that a local initiative, as defined in subdivision (w) of Section 53810 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, offer a subcontract to an entity defined in Section 1396d(l)(2)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code providing services as defined in Section 1396d(a)(2)(C) of Title 42 of the United States Code and operating in the service area covered by the local initiative’s contract with the department. These entities are also known as federally qualified health centers.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, managed care subcontracts offered to a federally qualified health center or a rural health
 clinic, as defined in Section 1396d(l)(1) of Title 42 of the United States Code, by a local initiative, county organized health system, as defined in Section 12693.05 of the Insurance Code, commercial plan, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 53810 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, or a health plan contracting with a geographic managed care program, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 53902 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, shall be on the same terms and conditions offered to other subcontractors providing a similar scope of service. A beneficiary, subscriber, or enrollee of a program or plan who affirmatively selects, or is assigned by default to, a federally qualified health center or rural health clinic under the terms of a contract between a plan, government program, or a subcontractor of a plan or program, and a federally qualified health center or rural health clinic, shall be assigned directly to the federally qualified health center or rural health
 clinic, and not to an individual provider performing services on behalf of the federally qualified health center or rural health clinic.

(c) The department shall provide incentives in the competitive application process described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 53800 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, to encourage potential commercial plans as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 53810 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations to offer subcontracts to these federally qualified health centers.

(d) Reimbursement to federally qualified health centers and rural health centers for services provided pursuant to a subcontract with a local initiative, a commercial plan, geographic managed care program health plan, or a county organized health system, shall be paid in a manner that is not less than the level and amount of payment that the plan would
 make for the same scope of services if the services were furnished by a provider that is not a federally qualified health center or rural health clinic.

(e) (1) The department shall administer a program to ensure that total payments to federally qualified health centers and rural health clinics operating as managed care subcontractors pursuant to subdivision (d) comply with applicable federal law pursuant to Sections 1902(aa) and 1903(m)(2)(A)(ix) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Secs. 1396a(aa) and 1396b(m)(2)(A)(ix)). Under the department’s program, federally qualified health centers and rural health clinics subcontracting with local initiatives, commercial plans, county organized health systems, and geographic managed care program health plans shall seek supplemental reimbursement from the department through a per visit fee-for-service billing system utilizing the state’s Medi-Cal fee-for-service claims processing
 system contractor. To carry out this per visit payment process, each federally qualified health system and rural health clinic shall submit to the department for approval a rate differential calculated to reflect the amount necessary to reimburse the federally qualified health center or rural health clinic for the difference between the payment the center or clinic received from the managed care health plan and either the interim rate established by the department based on the center’s or clinic’s reasonable cost or the center’s or clinic’s prospective payment rate. The department shall adjust the computed rate differential as it deems necessary to minimize the difference between the center’s or clinic’s revenue from the plan and the center’s or clinic’s cost-based reimbursement or the center’s or clinic’s prospective payment rate.

(2) In addition, to the extent feasible, within six months of the end of the center’s or clinic’s fiscal year, the
 department shall perform an annual reconciliation to reasonable cost, and make payments to, or obtain a recovery from, the center or clinic.

(f) In calculating the capitation rates to be paid to local initiatives, commercial plans, geographic managed care program health plans, and county organized health systems, the department shall not include the additional dollar amount applicable to cost-based reimbursement that would otherwise be paid, absent cost-based reimbursement, to federally qualified health centers and rural health clinics in the Medi-Cal fee-for-service program.

(g) On or before September 30, 2002, the director shall conduct a study of the actual and projected impact of the transition from a cost-based reimbursement system to a prospective payment system for federally qualified health centers and rural health clinics. In conducting the study, the director shall
 evaluate the extent to which the prospective payment system stimulates expansion of services, including new facilities to expand capacity of the centers, and the extent to which actual and estimated prospective payment rates of federally qualified health centers and rural health clinics for the first five years of the prospective payment system are reflective of the cost of providing services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries. Clinics may submit cost reporting information to the department to provide data for the study.

(h) The department shall approve all contracts between federally qualified health centers or rural health clinics and a local initiative, commercial plan, geographic managed care program health plan, or county organized health system in order to ensure compliance with this section.

(i) This section shall not preclude the department from establishing pilot programs pursuant
 to Section 14087.329.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 281.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14087.329.

(a) The department may establish, for local initiative and for commercial plans, that are providing services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries under a two-plan model contract with the department, not more than two pilot programs for the establishment of reimbursement methodologies. The reimbursement methodologies shall not be limited to those provided in Section 14087.325. The pilot programs may be implemented by amendment to the contract between the department and the local initiative or commercial plan. The department may select the pilot
 program county or counties on a nonbid basis. The selected counties shall include one county with a sizable number of entities defined in Section 1396d(l)(2)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code. The department shall review each pilot program annually. Following the review, and notwithstanding any determination made pursuant to subdivision (d), the department shall terminate a pilot program established under this section and shall delete amendments made to the contract implementing the pilot program if the department determines that the pilot program creates any additional cost to the General Fund. The department may also terminate a pilot program based upon criteria specified in the department’s contract establishing the pilot program. The department shall provide the local initiative and commercial plan with notice of the department’s decision to terminate the pilot program for this reason at least 90 days prior to the termination date of the pilot program and deletion of the contract
 amendments.

(b) Each local initiative and commercial plan participating in a pilot program under this section shall make available to the department any and all financial, membership, utilization, and other information reasonably required by the department to conduct the annual review described in subdivision (a). The information may include, but is not limited to, the financial or other records of participating providers. The amendment to the contract between the local initiative or commercial plan and the department establishing the pilot program shall specify a reasonable timeframe in which the commercial plan or local initiative shall furnish records to the department pursuant to the request of the department.

(c) In assessing whether the pilot program creates any additional cost to the General Fund, as described in subdivision (a), the department shall specifically consider
 all of the following factors, and may consider additional factors:

(1) Increases in the number of Medi-Cal beneficiaries assigned by the plan to cost-based primary care providers. To enable the department to evaluate these factors, the department may include in the contract amendments establishing the pilot program a requirement that contractors shall periodically report data regarding the number of plan members assigned to each cost-based primary care provider in the plan’s network.

(2) Expansions in the services provided by providers entitled to cost-based reimbursement under the Medi-Cal program.

(3) Medi-Cal caseload or plan membership growth.

(4) Inflation or other reasonable costs of provider operations.

(5) The necessity for a plan to assign plan members to specific primary care providers to meet all of the following requirements:

(A) Medi-Cal contract requirements for access to care.

(B) Unique Medi-Cal member cultural and linguistic needs.

(C) Unique member needs for age-appropriate, gender-appropriate, or pregnancy care requirements.

(d) The pilot program shall be deemed to be successful if the alternative reimbursement methodologies tested result in no additional cost to the General Fund as described in subdivision (c), and the local initiatives, commercial plans, and federally qualified health centers participating in the pilot program agree to accept full financial risk for the scope of
 services provided by the federally qualified health centers during the final year of the pilot program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 649, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14087.35.

(a) Because of the unique circumstances that exist in the County of Alameda, it is necessary that the Board of Supervisors of the County of Alameda be given authority to create a health authority separate and apart from the County of Alameda as a means of establishing the local initiative component of the state-mandated two-plan managed care model for the delivery of medical care and services to the Medi-Cal populations. It is further necessary to enable the board of supervisors to expand publicly assisted medical and health care
 delivery by the newly created health authority to other populations should the board of supervisors elect to do so. Thus, the adoption of a special act is required.

(b) The Board of Supervisors of the County of Alameda may, by ordinance, establish a health authority separate and apart from the County of Alameda, whose governing board shall reflect the diversity of local stakeholders such as provider groups, beneficiary groups, and officials of government, and that is appointed by the board of supervisors. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the governing board may include, but need not be limited to, the following: a member of the board of supervisors, individuals that represent and further the interests of the perspectives of Medi-Cal beneficiaries, and individuals that represent and further the interests of the perspectives of Medi-Cal provider physicians and other health practitioners, hospitals, and nonprofit community
 health centers. Other perspectives may be represented at the discretion of the board of supervisors. The enabling ordinance shall more specifically set forth the membership of the health authority governing board, the qualifications for individual members, the manner of appointment, selection, or removal of governing board members, their terms of office, and all other matters that the board of supervisors deems necessary or convenient for the conduct of the health authority’s activities.

(c) The governing board of the health authority and the appropriate state departments, to the extent permitted by federal law, may negotiate and enter into contracts to provide or arrange for health care services for any or all persons who are eligible to receive benefits under the Medi-Cal program and for other targeted populations. The contracts may be on an exclusive or nonexclusive basis, and shall include payment provisions on any basis negotiated between
 the state and health authority. Prior to the commencement of operations, the health authority shall be licensed as a health care service plan pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Services Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code).

(d) The board of supervisors may transfer responsibility for administration of county-provided health care services to the health authority for the purpose of service of populations including uninsured and indigent persons subject to the provisions of any ordinances or resolutions passed by the board of supervisors. The transfer of administrative responsibility for those health care services shall not relieve the county of its responsibility for indigent care pursuant to Section 17000. In addition, the services and programs of the health authority may include, but are not limited to, individuals covered under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act,
 contained in Subchapter XVIII (commencing with Section 1395) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code, and individuals and groups employed by public agencies and private businesses.

(e) As a legal entity separate and apart from the County of Alameda, the health authority shall file the statement required by Section 53051 of the Government Code. The health authority shall have the power to acquire, possess, and dispose of real or personal property as may be necessary for the performance of its functions, to sue or be sued, to employ personnel and contract for services required to meet its obligations, and to enter into agreements under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(f) (1) The health authority shall be deemed to be a legal entity separate and apart from the County of Alameda, and shall not
 be considered to be an agency, division, department, or instrumentality of the County of Alameda.

(2) The health authority shall not be governed by, nor be subject to, the Charter of the County of Alameda and shall not be subject to county policies or operational rules, including, but not limited to, those relating to personnel and procurement.

(g) The health authority shall be considered a public entity, and employees of the health authority shall be considered public employees, for purposes of Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code, relating to claims and actions against public entities and public employees. Members of the governing board of the health authority shall not be vicariously liable for injuries caused by the act or omission of the health authority or advisory body to the extent that protection applies to members of governing
 boards of local public entities generally under Section 820.9 of the Government Code.

(h) Upon the enactment of the ordinance, all rights, powers, duties, privileges, and immunities vested in the County of Alameda with respect to the subject matter of this section shall be vested in the health authority. Any obligation of the health authority, statutory, contractual, or otherwise, shall be the obligation solely of the health authority and shall not be the obligation of the County of Alameda or the state.

(i) The health authority shall not be a “person” subject to suit under the Cartwright Act, Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code.

(j) The health authority created pursuant to this section may borrow from the county and the county may lend the health
 authority funds, or issue revenue anticipation notes to obtain those funds necessary to commence operations.

(k) The health authority or the county, or both, may engage in marketing, advertising, and promotion of the medical and health care services made available to the target populations by the health authority.

(l) Provisions for the termination of the health authority’s activities with respect to the delivery of services to Medi-Cal populations shall be contained in the appropriate contracts executed by and between the health authority and the appropriate state departments.

(m) If the board of supervisors expands publicly assisted medical and health care delivery by the health authority to other populations, and the board of supervisors subsequently determines that the health authority may no longer
 function for the purpose of the expanded delivery, at the time as the health authority’s existing obligations with respect thereto have been satisfied, the board of supervisors may, by ordinance, terminate the expanded delivery activities of the health authority.

(n) All assets of the health authority that are related to Medi-Cal services shall be disposed of pursuant to the Medi-Cal related contract entered into between the state and the health authority.

(o) All liabilities or obligations of the health authority with respect to its activities pursuant to the state-mandated two-plan managed care model for the delivery of medical care and services to the Medi-Cal population shall be the liabilities or obligations of the health authority, and shall not become the liabilities or obligations of the county upon the termination of the health authority or at any other time. Any
 liabilities or obligations of the health authority with respect to the liquidation or disposition of the health authority’s assets upon termination of the health authority shall not become the liabilities or obligations of the county, except that the county shall manage any remaining Medi-Cal related assets of the health authority until superseded by a plan approved by the department.

(p) The Legislature finds and declares that Section 14105 provides that the Director of Health Services prescribe the policies for the administration of Medi-Cal managed care contracts. The state-mandated two-plan managed care model distributed by the director sets forth that policy, expressly providing that local stakeholders, including government officials, providers, and community-based organizations, are afforded maximum flexibility and control in designing a delivery system that reflects the needs and priorities of the community that it serves. The mandated
 model requires that the governing board of the local initiative reflect an effort to include representation of the perspectives of provider and beneficiary groups. To effectuate this policy, all of the following shall apply:

(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a member of the governing board of the health authority shall be deemed not to be interested in a contract entered into by the health authority within the meaning of Article 4 (commencing with Section 1090) of Chapter 1 of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code if all the following apply:

(A) The member was appointed to represent the interests of physicians, health care practitioners, hospitals, pharmacies, or other health care organizations.

(B) The contract authorizes the member or the organization the member represents to provide
 services to beneficiaries or administrative services under the health authority’s programs.

(C) The contract contains substantially the same terms and conditions as contracts entered into with other individuals or organizations that the member was appointed to represent.

(D) The member does not influence or attempt to influence the health authority or another member of the health authority to enter into the contract in which the member is interested.

(E) The member discloses the interest to the health authority and abstains from voting on the contract.

(F) The health authority notes the member’s disclosure and abstention in its official records and authorizes the contract in good faith by a vote of its membership sufficient for the purpose without
 counting the vote of the interested member.

(2) Notwithstanding Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 1125) of Chapter 1 of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code related to incompatible activities, no member of the governing board, no officer, and no member of the alliance staff shall be considered to be engaged in activities inconsistent and incompatible with his or her duties as a governing board member, officer, or staff person solely as a result of employment or affiliation with the county, private hospital, clinic, pharmacy, other provider group, employee organization, or citizen’s group.

(q) (1) The health authority may use a computerized management information system in connection with the administration of its health delivery system, including the administration of the state-mandated two-plan Medi-Cal managed care model.

(2) Information maintained in the management information system that pertains to persons who are Medi-Cal applicants or recipients shall be confidential pursuant to Section 14100.2, and shall not be open to examination other than for purposes directly connected with the administration of the Medi-Cal program, including, but not limited to, those set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 14100.2. This safeguarded information includes, but is not limited to, names and addresses, medical services provided, social and economic conditions or circumstances, health authority evaluation of personal information, and medical data, including diagnosis and past history of disease or disability.

(3) Information maintained in the management information system that pertains to peer review-related activities shall be confidential and subject to the full protections of the law with respect to the
 confidentiality of activities related to peer review generally.

(r) The records of the health authority, whether paper records, records maintained in the management information system, or records in any other form, that relate to rates of payment, including records relating to rates of payment determination, allocation or distribution methodologies, formulas or calculations, and records of the health authority that relate to contract negotiations with providers of health care for alternative rates, shall not be subject to disclosure pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 6250) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code). The transmission of the records, or the information contained therein in an alternative form, to the board of supervisors shall not constitute a waiver of exemption from disclosure, and the records and information once transmitted to the board of supervisors shall be subject to
 this same exemption.

(s) (1) (A) Notwithstanding the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), the governing board of the health authority may meet in closed session for the purpose of discussion of, or taking action on matters involving, health authority trade secrets.

(B) The requirement that the authority make a public report of actions taken in closed session and the vote or abstention of every member present may be limited to a brief general description of the action taken and the vote so as to prevent the disclosure of a trade secret.

(C) For purposes of this subdivision, “health authority trade secret” means a trade secret, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 3426.1 of the Civil
 Code, that also meets both of the following criteria:

(i) The secrecy of the information is necessary for the health authority to initiate a new service, program, marketing strategy, business plan, or technology, or to add a benefit or product.

(ii) Premature disclosure of the trade secret would create a substantial probability of depriving the health authority of a substantial economic benefit or opportunity.

(2) Those records of the health authority that reveal the health authority’s trade secrets are exempt from disclosure pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 6250) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code), or any similar local law requiring the disclosure of public records. This exemption shall apply for a period of two years after the service, program,
 marketing strategy, business plan, technology, benefit, or product that is the subject of the trade secret is formally adopted by the governing body of the health authority, provided that the service, program, marketing strategy, business plan, technology, benefit, or product continues to be a trade secret. The governing board may delete the portion or portions containing trade secrets from any documents that were finally approved in the closed session held pursuant to paragraph (1) that are provided to persons who have made the timely or standing request.

(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing the governing board from meeting in closed session as otherwise provided by law.

(t) Open sessions of the health authority shall constitute official proceedings authorized by law within the meaning of Section 47 of the Civil Code, and those privileges set forth in that
 section with respect to official proceedings shall apply to open sessions of the health authority.

(u) The health authority shall be considered a public agency for purposes of eligibility with respect to grants and other funding and loan guarantee programs. Contributions to the health authority shall be tax deductible to the extent permitted by state and federal law.

(v) Contracts by and between the health authority and the state, and contracts by and between the health authority and providers of health care, goods, or services may be let on a nonbid basis, and shall be exempt from Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(w) (1) Provisions of the Evidence Code, the Government Code, including the California Public Records Act (Chapter 3.5
 (commencing with Section 6250) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code), the Civil Code, the Business and Professions Code, and other applicable law pertaining to the confidentiality of peer review activities of peer review bodies shall apply to the peer review activities of the health authority. Peer review proceedings shall constitute an official proceeding authorized by law within the meaning of Section 47 of the Civil Code, and those privileges set forth in that section with respect to official proceedings shall apply to peer review proceedings of the health authority. If the health authority is required by law or contractual obligation to submit to the state or federal government peer review information or information relevant to the credentialing of a participating provider, that submission shall not constitute a waiver of confidentiality. The laws pertaining to the confidentiality of peer review activities shall be together construed as extending, to the extent permitted by law, the maximum
 degree of protection of confidentiality.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, Section 1461 of the Health and Safety Code shall apply to hearings on the reports of hospital medical audit or quality assurance committees as they relate to network providers or applicants.

(x) The health authority shall carry general liability insurance to the extent sufficient to cover its activities.

(y) The establishment of a health authority under Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5) shall be valid as if established pursuant to this section and this section shall apply to that health authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 228, Sec. 12.2.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14087.36.

(a) The following definitions shall apply for purposes of this section:

(1) “County” means the City and County of San Francisco.

(2) “Board” means the Board of Supervisors of the City and County of San Francisco.

(3) “Department” means the State Department of Health Care Services.

(4) “Governing body” means the governing body of the health authority.

(5) “Health authority” means the separate public agency established by the
 board of supervisors to operate a health care system in the county and to engage in the other activities authorized by this section.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that it is necessary that a health authority be established in the county to arrange for the provision of health care services in order to meet the problems of the delivery of publicly assisted medical care in the county, to enter into a contract with the department under Article 2.97 (commencing with Section 14093), or to contract with a health care service plan on terms and conditions acceptable to the department, and to demonstrate ways of promoting quality care and cost efficiency.

(c) The county may, by resolution or ordinance, establish a health authority to act as and be the local initiative component of the
 Medi-Cal state plan pursuant to regulations adopted by the department. If the board elects to establish a health authority, all rights, powers, duties, privileges, and immunities vested in a county under Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5) and Article 2.97 (commencing with Section 14093) shall be vested in the health authority. The health authority shall have all power necessary and appropriate to operate programs involving health care services, including, but not limited to, the power to acquire, possess, and dispose of real or personal property, to employ personnel and contract for services required to meet its obligations, to sue or be sued, to take all actions and engage in all public and private business activities, subject to any applicable licensure, as permitted a health care service plan pursuant to Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, and
 to enter into agreements under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(d) (1) (A) The health authority shall be considered a public entity for purposes of Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code, separate and distinct from the county, and shall file the statement required by Section 53051 of the Government Code. The health authority shall have primary responsibility to provide the defense and indemnification required under Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code for employees of the health authority who are employees of the county. The health authority shall provide insurance under terms and conditions required by the county in order to satisfy its obligations under this
 section.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “employee” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Section 810.2 of the Government Code.

(2) The health authority shall not be considered to be an agency, division, department, or instrumentality of the county and shall not be subject to the personnel, procurement, or other operational rules of the county.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any obligations of the health authority, statutory, contractual, or otherwise, shall be the obligations solely of the health authority and shall not be the obligations of the county, unless expressly provided for in a contract between the authority and the county, nor of the state.

(4) Except as agreed to by contract with the county, no liability of the health authority shall become an obligation of the county upon either termination of the health authority or the liquidation or disposition of the health authority’s remaining assets.

(e) (1) To the full extent permitted by federal law, the department and the health authority may enter into contracts to provide or arrange for health care services for any or all persons who are eligible to receive benefits under the Medi-Cal program. The contracts may be on an exclusive or nonexclusive basis, and shall include payment provisions on any basis negotiated between the department and the health authority. The health authority may also enter into contracts for the provision of health care services to individuals including, but not limited to, those
 covered under Subchapter XVIII (commencing with Section 1395) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code, individuals employed by public agencies and private businesses, and uninsured or indigent individuals.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), or subdivision (f), the health authority may not operate health plans or programs for individuals covered under Subchapter XVIII (commencing with Section 1395) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code, or for private businesses, until the health authority is in full compliance with all of the requirements of the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 under Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, including tangible net equity requirements applicable to a licensed health care service plan. This limitation shall not
 preclude the health authority from enrolling persons pursuant to the county’s obligations under Section 17000, or from enrolling county employees.

(f) The board of supervisors may transfer responsibility for administration of county-provided health care services to the health authority for the purpose of service of populations including uninsured and indigent persons, subject to the provisions of any ordinances or resolutions passed by the county board of supervisors. The transfer of administrative responsibility for those health care services shall not relieve the county of its responsibility for indigent care pursuant to Section 17000. The health authority may also enter into contracts for the provision of health care services to individuals including, but not limited to, those covered under Subchapter XVIII (commencing with Section 1395) of Chapter
 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code, and individuals employed by public agencies and private businesses.

(g) Upon creation, the health authority may borrow from the county and the county may lend the authority funds, or issue revenue anticipation notes to obtain those funds necessary to commence operations or perform the activities of the health authority. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, both the county and the health authority shall be eligible to receive funding under subdivision (p) of Section 14163.

(h) The county may terminate the health authority, but only by an ordinance approved by a two-thirds affirmative vote of the full board.

(i) Prior to the termination of the health authority, the county shall
 notify the department of its intent to terminate the health authority. The department shall conduct an audit of the health authority’s records within 30 days of notification to determine the liabilities and assets of the health authority. The department shall report its findings to the county and to the Department of Managed Health Care within 10 days of completion of the audit. The county shall prepare a plan to liquidate or otherwise dispose of the assets of the health authority and to pay the liabilities of the health authority to the extent of the health authority’s assets, and present the plan to the department and the Department of Managed Health Care within 30 days upon receipt of these findings.
